bs_BA.dic
Abraham/PR
Ademović/PR
Adilović/PR
Adi/PR
Adna/PR
Ahmet/PR
Ajdin/PR
Ajna/PR
Aldin/PR
Aleksa/PR
Alenka/PR
Alić/PR
Alija/PR
Alilović/PR
Almir/PR
Amar/PR
Amel/PR
Amila/PR
Amir/PR
Ana/PR
Andrej/PR
Andrija/PR
Anton/PR
Antun/PR
Anja/PR
Arijana/PR
Armenulić/PR
Armin/PR
Arnautović/PR
Arnela/PR
Artuković/PR
Asaf/PR
Asim/PR
Asja/PR
Asmir/PR
Avdija/P  vr:ime
Azra/PR
Backović/PR
Bajević/PR
Bajrami/PR
Bakir/PR
Barbara/PR
Barišić/PR
Batković/PR
Bazdulj/PR
Bebek/PR
Bećirbegović/PR
Begović/PR
Belkić/PR
Beneš/PR
Berberović/PR
Beriz/PR
Bešić/PR
Bešlić/PR
Biljana/PR
Bisera/PR
Blaškić/PR
Blaž/PR
Bodiroga/PR
Bogdan/PR
Bolić/PR
Borić/PR
Boris/PR
Bossinensis/PR
Braco/PR
Brano/PR
Bregović/PR
Brkić/PR
Bruno/PR
Burić/PR
Cvijetin/PR
Čardžić/PR
Čilić/PR
Čolić/PR
Čuvidina/PR
Ćazim/PR
Ćopić/PR
Ćorović/PR
Dabiša/PR
Dalipagić/PR
Danijal/PR
Danilović/PR
Danon/PR
Dario/P
Darko/PR
Dašić/PR
David/PR
Davorin/PR
Davor/PR
Davud/PR
Dedijer/PR
Dejan/PR
Delemović/PR
Delibašić/PR
Delić/PR
Demirović/PR
Denis/PR
Dervišević/PR
Derviš/PR
Dijak/PR
Dijana/PR
Dimitrijević/PR
Dina/PR
Dino/PR
Divjak/PR
Dizdar/PR
Dora/PR
Dragan/PR
Drago/PR
Dragoslav/PR
Dragutin/PR
Dražen/PR
Dučić/PR
Dugonjić/PR
Dujmović/PR
Dunja/PR
Duraković/PR
Duro/PR
Dušan/PR
Džeko/PR
Džemal/PR
Dževad/PR
Džihan/PR
Džinović/PR
Džumhur/PR
Đedović/PR
Đikić/PR
Đinđić/PR
Đorđević/PR
Đukanović/PR
Đukić/PR
Đurić/PR
Đurić/PR
Đuro/PR
Edin/PR
Edisa/PR
Edis/PR
Edo/PR
Ekrem/PR
Eldin/PR
Elma/PR
Elmedina/PR
Elmedin/PR
Elmedin/PR
Elvira/PR
Elvir/PR
Elvis/PR
Ema/PR
Emerik/PR
Emina/PR
Emira/PR
Emir/PR
Endi/PR
Enis/PR
Ensad/PR
Envera/PR
Enver/PR
Ermina/PR
Ermin/PR
Esed/PR
Eva/PR
Fahra/PR
Fahrudin/PR
Faris/PR
Faruk/PR
Fazlagić/PR
Fazlija/PR
Ferhatović/PR
Fikret/PR
Filipović/PR
Filip/PR
Finci/PR
Franciscus/PR
Franjić/PR
Franjo/PR
Fuad/PR
Gabrijel/PR
Gavrankapetanović/PR
Gavrilo/PR
Ghandi/PR
Glamočak/PR
Gojko/PR
Gojković/PR
Golubović/PR
Gorana/PR
Goran/PR
Gradimir/PR
Granov/PR
Grgić/PR
Guber/PR
Gunić/PR
Hadžibegić/PR
Hadžić/PR
Hadžihafizbegović/PR
Hadžović/PR
Hajrović/PR
Hajrudin/PR
Hakala/PR
Halid/PR
Halilhodžić/PR
Halilović/PR
Hamdija/PR
Hamed/PR
Hamid/PR
Hamza/PR
Hana/PR
Handanovič/PR
Hanka/PR
Haračić/PR
Haris/PR
Harrington/PR
Harun/PR
Hasanović/PR
Hasan/PR
Hasković/PR
Helena/PR
Hemon/PR
Hibić/PR
Himzo/PR
Hodžić/PR
Horvat/PR
Hromadžić/PR
Hrustanbegović/PR
Hubijar/PR
Ibišević/PR
Ibrahim/PR
Ibrulj/PR
Igbala/PR
Ilhamija/PR
Ilić/PR
Indira/PR
Inzko/PR
Irhad/PR
Islam/PR  # Islam Đugum, olimpijac
Isović/PR
Ivana/PR
Ivan/PR
Ivo/PR
Izet/PR
Izudin/PR
Jahić/PR
Jamak/PR
Jasenko/PR
Jasminka/PR
Jasmin/PR
Jelena/PR
Jerko/PR
Josip/PR
Jovan/PR
Jozo/PR
Jukić/PR
Jurić/PR
Jusufović/PR
Kada/PR  # Kada Delić, olimpijka
Kapetanović/PR
Karabašić/PR
Karadžić/PR
Karić/PR
Karla/PR
Kasim/PR
Kecmanović/PR
Kenan/PR
Kerim/PR
Kimani/PR
Kitić/PR
Klasnić/PR
Kljuić/PR
Kočić/PR
Kodžo/PR
Kolak/PR
Komšić/PR
Konjić/PR
Koroman/PR
Kosovac/PR
Kotromanić/PR
Kovač/PR
Kraišnik/PR
Krehmić/PR
Krstajić/PR
Krvavac/PR
Kulinić/PR
Kulović/PR
Kurjak/PR
Kusturica/PR
Kvesić/PR
Laikert/PR
Laković/PR
Lana/PR
Lejla/PR
Likić/PR
Lisak/PR
Lošić/PR
Lovren/PR
Luburić/PR
Luka/PR
Lukovac/PR
Ljubičić/PR
Maajka/PR # Edo Maajka, muzičar
Mahmut/PR
Maja/PR
Malden/PR
Mameledžija/PR
Margetić/PR
Marjanović/PR
Martinović/PR
Mato/PR
Mehmedalija/PR
Meho/PR
Merima/PR
Mesić/PR
Mihailo/PR
Milan/PR
Miličević/PR
Milo/PR
Miodrag/PR
Miralem/PR
Mirko/PR
Mirna/PR
Miro/PR
Miroslav/PR
Mirza/PR
Misimović/PR
Mladić/PR
Mlakar/PR
Monteno/PR
Mrkanović/PR
Mujanović/PR
Mujdža/PR
Mulaomerović/PR
Mulroney/PR
Muradif/PR
Muratović/PR
Mustapić/PR
Nada/PR
Nakaš/PR
Nasiha/PR
Nedžad/PR
Nenad/PR
Nesim/PR
Neven/PR
Nijaz/PR
Nikica/PR
Nikolić/PR
Nikolić/PR
Nikša/PR
Nikšić/PR
Ninoslav/PR
Nišić/PR
Novak/PR
Novković/PR
Odžaković/PR
Ognjen/PR
Osim/PR
Oskar/PR
Paldum/PR
Panić/PR
Pašović/PR
Pavelić/PR
Peco/PR
Pejaković/PR
Perković/PR
Petković/PR
Piljak/PR
Piplica/PR
Pjanić/PR
Pjer/PR
Planinić/PR
Plavšić/PR
Posejdon/PR
Posković/PR
Prelog/PR
Prerad/PR
Pucar/PR
Radić/PR
Radovan/PR
Raguž/PR
Rakitić/PR
Ramić/PR
Rataj/PR
Ratko/PR
Renovica/PR
Reuf/PR
Rodoljub/PR
Rothbart/PR
Sabina/PR
Sabira/PR
Safvet/PR
Salihamidžić/PR
Samardžija/PR
Samir/PR
Sandra/PR
Sanela/PR
Sarajlić/PR
Sara/PR
Savo/PR
Schafferer/PR
Seid/PR
Sejad/PR
Seka/PR
Selimović/PR
Semezdin/PR
Semir/PR
Serdarević/PR
Sergej/PR
Silajdžić/PR
Silvana/PR
Sinanović/PR
Siniša/PR
Slaven/PR
Slišković/PR
Smajlagić/PR
Sokolović/PR
Srđan/PR
Srna/PR
Stanković/PR
Stefan/PR
Stojanović/PR
Stojnić/PR
Suljaković/PR
Sušić/PR
Šahinović/PR
Šantić/PR
Šarović/PR
Šegrt/PR
Šešelj/PR
Šiber/PR
Škiljan/PR
Škoro/PR
Štulić/PR
Tadić/PR
Tanković/PR
Tanović/PR
Tarik/PR
Teletović/PR
Tihić/PR
Tihomir/PR
Tin/PR
Tomašević/PR
Tomislav/PR
Tomo/PR
Tunjević/PR
Ubiparip/PR
Umihana/PR
Vahid/PR
Varešanović/PR
Vedad/PR
Vehid/PR
Veličković/PR
Veselin/PR
Vesna/PR
Višća/PR
Vitomir/PR
Vlado/PR
Vlašković/PR
Vučkić/PR
Vukčić/PR
Vuletić/PR
Zaciragić/PR
Zdravko/PR
Zeherović/PR
Zijad/PR
Zijad/PR
Zijo/PR
Zjajo/PR
Zonić/PR
Zoran/PR
Zuko/PR
Zulfikarpašić/PR
Zvjezdan/PR
Žalica/PR
Žbanić/PR
Željko/PR
Žujo/PR
